Hawaii statutes.
§76-75 Personnel director. The merit
appeals board shall appoint and may at pleasure remove a personnel director,
who shall be the chief administrative officer of the department of civil
service. The director shall, at the time of the director's appointment, and
thereafter, be thoroughly familiar with the principles and methods of personnel
administration and shall believe in applying merit principles and scientific
administrative methods to public personnel administration. [L 1955, c 274, pt
of §1; RL 1955, §3-18; am L 1957, c 207, §1(a); am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §11; HRS
§76-75; am L 1977, c 61, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 2000, c 253, §34]

Case Notes

Conflicting provisions of the Maui Charter are invalid. 59
H. 65, 576 P.2d 1029.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next